en: Chop grilled lamb rib, Pan-fried lamb rib
fr: Côte première d'agneau grillée, Côte première d'agneau poêlée

en: Lamb rib chop
fr: Côte d'agneau première

en: Lamb leg
fr: Gigot d'agneau

en: Frozen lamb leg
fr: Gigot d'agneau surgelé

en: Lamb shank
fr: Jarret d'agneau

en: Frozen lamb shank
fr: Jarret d'agneau surgelé

en: Roasted lamb leg, Baked lamb leg
fr: Gigot d'agneau rôti au four, Gigot d'agneau cuit au four

en: Braised lamb leg
fr: Gigot d'agneau braisé

en: Grilled lamb leg, Pan-fried lamb leg
fr: Gigot d'agneau grillé, Gigot d'agneau poêlé

en: Lamb saddle
fr: Selle d'agneau

en: Grilled lamb saddle, Pan-fried lamb saddle
fr: Selle d'agneau partie maigre grillée, Selle d'agneau partie maigre poêlée

en: Roasted lean lamb saddle, Baked lean lamb saddle
fr: Selle d'agneau partie maigre rôtie, Selle d'agneau partie maigre cuite au four

en: Braised lamb neck, Boiled lamb neck
fr: Collier d'agneau braisé, Collier d'agneau bouilli

en: Lamb neck
fr: Collier d'agneau

en: Lamb on skewer
de: Lammspieße
fr: Brochette d'agneau
hr: Janjetina na ražnju

en: Lamb offals
fr: Abats d'agneau

en: Frozen lamb offals
fr: Abats d'agneau surgelés

en: Lamb bone
fr: Os d'agneau

en: Lamb brain
fr: Cervelle d'agneau

en: Cooked lamb brains
fr: Cervelles d'agneau cuites